Utah statutes.
78B-6-145.   Restrictions on disclosure of information -- Violations -- Penalty.

(1)  Information maintained or filed with the bureau under this chapter may not be disclosed except as provided by this chapter, or pursuant to a court order.

(2)  Any person who discloses information obtained from the bureau's voluntary adoption registry in violation of this part, or knowingly allows that information to be disclosed in violation of this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

